Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.345

Firearms return and disposal—Extreme risk protection orders.

(1) If an extreme risk protection order is terminated or expires without renewal, a law enforcement agency holding any firearm that has been surrendered pursuant to this chapter shall return any surrendered firearm requested by a respondent only after confirming, through a background check, that the respondent is currently eligible to own or possess firearms under federal and state law, and after confirming with the court that the extreme risk protection order has terminated or has expired without renewal.

(2) A law enforcement agency must, if requested, provide prior notice of the return of a firearm to a respondent to family or household members and to an intimate partner of the respondent in the manner provided in RCW 9.41.340 and 9.41.345.

(3) Any firearm surrendered by a respondent pursuant to RCW 7.105.340 that remains unclaimed by the lawful owner shall be disposed of in accordance with the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures for the disposal of firearms in police custody.

[ 2021 c 215 s 46.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.